New York, session 2025-2026, S3390.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 "Beau's law". 3 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6438-d to 4 read as follows: 5 § 6438-d. Notification of alcohol or controlled substance violations. 6 1. Every institution of higher education shall make publicly accessible 7 its policy on notifying a parent, guardian, or emergency contact of a 8 violation by a student under the age of twenty-one for the use or 9 possession of alcohol or a controlled substance. Such violations may 10 include but shall not be limited to, rule infractions, violations of 11 federal, state, or local law, or controlled substance or alcohol related 12 hospitalizations or overdoses. 13 2. All institutions of higher education shall conduct regular training 14 on the provisions of the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 15 U.S.C. § 1232g; 34 CFR Part 99) related to health and safety emergencies 16 and its impact on such institutions' response to student alcohol or 17 controlled substance related hospitalizations or overdoses. These train- 18 ings shall be conducted for relevant administration and staff as identi- 19 fied by the institution. Such institutions may set the time intervals 20 and parameters for such trainings. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02969-03-5 S. 3390--A 2 1 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 2 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 3 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 4 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 5 to be made and completed on or before such effective date.